Nevada, session 83, SB169.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 597 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a third-party
reservation service platform provider shall not list, advertise,
promote or sell a reservation, appointment or booking for a
customer at any establishment through the third-party reservation
service platform of the provider unless the provider has entered
into a written agreement with either the establishment or a
designee of the establishment that expressly authorizes the
provider to engage in such activities.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a violation of
the provisions of subsection 1 constitutes a deceptive trade practice
for the purposes of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive, and each
day’s continuance of the violation constitutes a separate and
distinct violation.
3. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 is not
subject to any criminal penalty set forth in subsection 3 of
NRS 598.0999.
4. The provisions of this section do not apply to a document
preparation service as defined in NRS 240A.030.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Establishment” means a person or entity that offers goods
or services, whether public or private, and relies on scheduled
reservations, appointments or bookings in the provision of such
goods or services.
(b) “Third-party reservation service platform”:
(1) Means an Internet website, online service or mobile
application which offers or arranges a reservation, appointment or
booking for a customer at an establishment and which is owned
and operated by a person other than the person who owns the
establishment.
(2) Does not include a person or entity which arranges, at
the request of a customer and at no charge to the customer, a
reservation, appointment or booking for the customer at an
establishment if the reservation, appointment or booking is
personal to the customer and nontransferable, and the person or
entity:
(I) Shares the contact information of the customer with
the establishment;
(II) Authorizes the establishment to confirm the
reservation, appointment or booking with the customer; and
(III) Honors any request from an establishment to opt
out of any future reservations, appointments or bookings arranged
by the person or entity.
(c) “Third-party reservation service platform provider” or
“provider” means a person who operates a third-party reservation
service platform.
Sec. 2. NRS 598.0999 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.0999 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 598.0974,
a person who violates a court order or injunction issued pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive, upon a
complaint brought by the Commissioner, the Director, the district
attorney of any county of this State or the Attorney General shall
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
forfeit and pay to the State General Fund a civil penalty of not more
than $10,000 for each violation. For the purpose of this section, the
court issuing the order or injunction retains jurisdiction over the
action or proceeding. Such civil penalties are in addition to any
other penalty or remedy available for the enforcement of the
provisions of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 598.0974, in any
action brought pursuant to the provisions of NRS 598.0903 to
598.0999, inclusive, if the court finds that a person has willfully
engaged in a deceptive trade practice, the Commissioner, the
Director, the district attorney of any county in this State or the
Attorney General bringing the action may recover a civil penalty not
to exceed $15,000 for each violation. The court in any such action
may, in addition to any other relief or reimbursement, award
reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
3. [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act, a
natural person, firm, or any officer or managing agent of any
corporation or association who knowingly and willfully engages in a
deceptive trade practice:
(a) For an offense involving a loss of property or services valued
at $1,200 or more but less than $5,000, is guilty of a category D
felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(b) For an offense involving a loss of property or services
valued at $5,000 or more but less than $25,000, is guilty of a
category C felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) For an offense involving a loss of property or services valued
at $25,000 or more but less than $100,000, is guilty of a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(d) For an offense involving a loss of property or services
valued at $100,000 or more, is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 20 years, and by a fine of not more than $15,000.
(e) For any offense other than an offense described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
 The court may require the natural person, firm, or officer or
managing agent of the corporation or association to pay to the
aggrieved party damages on all profits derived from the knowing
and willful engagement in a deceptive trade practice and treble
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
damages on all damages suffered by reason of the deceptive trade
practice.
4. If a person violates any provision of NRS 598.0903 to
598.0999, inclusive, 598.100 to 598.2801, inclusive, 598.405 to
598.525, inclusive, 598.741 to 598.787, inclusive, 598.840
to 598.966, inclusive, or 598.9701 to 598.9718, inclusive, fails to
comply with a judgment or order of any court in this State
concerning a violation of such a provision, or fails to comply with
an assurance of discontinuance or other agreement concerning an
alleged violation of such a provision, the Commissioner or the
district attorney of any county may bring an action in the name of
the State of Nevada seeking:
(a) The suspension of the person’s privilege to conduct business
within this State; or
(b) If the defendant is a corporation, dissolution of the
corporation.
 The court may grant or deny the relief sought or may order other
appropriate relief.
5. If a person violates any provision of NRS 228.500 to
228.640, inclusive, fails to comply with a judgment or order of any
court in this State concerning a violation of such a provision, or fails
to comply with an assurance of discontinuance or other agreement
concerning an alleged violation of such a provision, the Attorney
General may bring an action in the name of the State of Nevada
seeking:
(a) The suspension of the person’s privilege to conduct business
within this State; or
(b) If the defendant is a corporation, dissolution of the
corporation.
 The court may grant or deny the relief sought or may order other
appropriate relief.
6. In an action brought by the Commissioner or the Attorney
General pursuant to subsection 4 or 5, process may be served by an
employee of the Consumer Affairs Unit of the Department of
Business and Industry or an employee of the Attorney General.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Property” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 193.0225.
(b) “Services” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.0829.
(c) “Value” means the fair market value of the property or
services at the time the deceptive trade practice occurred. The value
of a written instrument which does not have a readily ascertainable
market value is the greater of the face amount of the instrument less
the portion satisfied or the amount of economic loss to the owner of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
the instrument resulting from the deprivation of the instrument. The
trier of fact shall determine the value of all other property whose
value is not readily ascertainable, and may, in making that
determination, consider all relevant evidence, including evidence of
the value of the property to its owner.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)